District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Enhancing Consumer Protection Procedures Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title I of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia Certification and
Elected Term Amendment Act of 2010, effective May 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-160; D.C. Official
Code § 1-301.81 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 108d (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.88d) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 108d. Authority to issue subpoenas in investigation of consumer protection matters.
“(a) In an investigation into unfair, deceptive, unconscionable, or fraudulent trade
practices by or between a merchant or consumer, as defined in D.C. Official Code § 28-3901, the
Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee, may:
“(1) Subpoena individuals or corporate representatives;
“(2) Administer oaths;
“(3) Examine individuals or corporate representatives under oath;
“(4) Require sworn answers in writing to written interrogatories; or
“(5) Compel production of records, books, papers, contracts, and other
documents, verified by a sworn certificate of completion.
“(b) Subpoenas or interrogatories issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or D.C.
Official Code § 28-3910 shall contain the following:
“(1) The name of the person from whom testimony is sought or the documents or
materials requested;
“(2) The person at the Office of the Attorney General to whom the documents
shall be provided;
“(3) A detailed list of the specific documents, books, papers, or objects being
requested, if any;
“(4) The date, time, and place that the recipient is to appear to give testimony or
produce the materials specified under paragraph (3) of this subsection, or both;
“(5) A short, plain statement of the recipient’s rights and the procedure for
enforcing and contesting the subpoena; and
“(6) The signature of the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee,
approving the subpoena request.
“(c) Unless otherwise permitted by the Office of the Attorney General, only attorneys for
the Office of the Attorney General and their staff, other people involved in the investigation, the
witness under examination, his or her attorney, interpreters when needed, and, for the purpose of
taking the evidence, a stenographer or operator of a recording device may be present during the
taking of testimony.
“(d) In the case of refusal to comply fully with a subpoena or interrogatories issued under
this section, the Attorney General may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
an order requiring complete compliance and, where appropriate, imposing a fine payable to the
District. In assessing any fine for incomplete or inadequate compliance with the subpoena, the
court shall consider the income and assets of the person or entity being fined to ensure that the
monetary fine meaningfully deters inadequate compliance. Any failure to obey the order of the
court may be treated by the court as contempt.
“(e) Any person to whom a subpoena has been issued under this section or pursuant to
D.C. Official Code § 28-3910 may exercise the privileges enjoyed by all witnesses, and may
move to quash or modify the subpoena in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia on
grounds including:
“(1) The Attorney General failed to follow or satisfy the procedures set forth in
this section; or
“(2) Any grounds that exist under statute or common law for quashing or
modifying a subpoena or request for interrogatories.
“(f) In any action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia pertaining to a
subpoena issued under this section, or pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 28-3910, the Attorney
General shall be entitled to recover the costs of the action and reasonable attorneys’ fees.”.
(b) Section 108e (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.88e) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 108e. Authority to issue subpoenas in matters involving the financial exploitation of
vulnerable adults and the elderly.
“(a) Notwithstanding section 110(a), and subject to the requirements of this section, for
the purposes of seeking relief under sections 207 and 208 of the Criminal Abuse and Neglect of
Vulnerable Adults Act of 2000, effective November 23, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-166; D.C. Official
Code §§ 22-937 and 22-938), the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee, shall
have the authority to:
“(1) Subpoena individuals or corporate representatives;
“(2) Administer oaths;
“(3) Examine individuals or corporate representatives under oath;
“(4) Require sworn answers in writing to written interrogatories; or
“(5) Compel production of records, books, papers, contracts, and other
documents, verified by a sworn certificate of completion.
“(b)(1) The authority granted by this section may only be used in furtherance of seeking
relief under sections 207 and 208 of the Criminal Abuse and Neglect of Vulnerable Adults Act of
2000, effective November 23, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-166; D.C. Official Code §§ 22-937 and 22-
938).
“(2) Testimony obtained pursuant to this authority shall not be used in furtherance
of a criminal investigation related to a violation of section 203a of the Criminal Abuse and
Neglect of Vulnerable Adults Act of 2000, effective November 23, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-166; D.C.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Official Code § 22-933.01), and shall not be admissible in a criminal proceeding against the
person who provided the information.
“(c) The Attorney General shall not have the authority granted by this section if an
indictment, information, or petition has been filed with the court formally charging the target of
the investigation with a violation of section 203a of the Criminal Abuse and Neglect of
Vulnerable Adults Act of 2000, effective November 23, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-166; D.C. Official
Code § 22-933.01).
“(d) Powers granted pursuant to this section shall not be delegated other than to the Chief
Deputy Attorney General, a Deputy Attorney General, or an Assistant Deputy Attorney General.
“(e) Subpoenas or requests for interrogatories issued pursuant to this section shall contain
the information required in section 108d(b).
“(f) Unless otherwise permitted by the Office of the Attorney General, only attorneys for
the Office of the Attorney General and their staff, other people involved in the investigation, the
witness under examination, his or her attorney, interpreters when needed, and, for the purpose of
taking the evidence, a stenographer or operator of a recording device may be present during the
taking of testimony.
“(g) In the case of refusal to obey a subpoena or request for interrogatories issued under
this section, the Attorney General may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for
an order requiring compliance and where appropriate, imposing a fine payable to the District.
Any failure to obey the order of the court may be treated by the court as contempt. In any action
in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia pertaining to a subpoena issued under this
section, the Attorney General shall be entitled to recover the costs of the action and reasonable
attorneys’ fees.
“(h) Any person to whom a subpoena or request for interrogatories has been issued under
this section may exercise the privileges enjoyed by all witnesses and may move to quash or
modify the subpoena in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for the following reasons,
including:
“(1) The Attorney General failed to follow or satisfy the procedures set forth in
this section;
“(2) The Attorney General lacked the authority to issue the subpoena or request
for interrogatories under this section; or
“(3) Any other grounds that exist under statute or common law for quashing or
modification of a subpoena or request for interrogatories.”.
Sec. 3. The Abuse, Neglect, and Financial Exploitation of Vulnerable Adults and the
Elderly Act of 2000, effective June 8, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-301; D.C. Official Code § 22-931 et
seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 207(a)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 22-937(a)(1)) is amended to read as follows:
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) A temporary or permanent injunction, including requiring the violator to take
affirmative action;”.
(b) Section 208(a) (D.C. Official Code § 22-938(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) A temporary restraining order, including requiring the violator to take
affirmative action;”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) A preliminary injunction, including requiring the violator to take affirmative
action;”.
Sec. 4. Chapter 39 of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by striking the phrase “28-3904. Unfair or deceptive
trade practices.” and inserting the phrase “28-3904. Unfair, deceptive, or abusive trade
practices.” in its place.
(b) Section 28-3901 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) “Consumer” means:
“(A) When used as a noun, a person who, other than for purposes of
resale, does or would purchase, lease (as lessee), or receive consumer goods or services,
including as a co-obligor or surety, or does or would otherwise provide the economic demand for
a trade practice, or who donates money or goods to a charitable purpose or other non-profit
organization; or
“(B) When used as an adjective, describes anything, without exception,
that:
“(i) A person does or would purchase, lease (as lessee), or receive
and normally use for personal, household, or family purposes, or is money or goods a person
donates or would donate to a charitable purpose or other non-profit organization; or
“(ii) A person described in § 28-3905(k)(1)(B) or (C) purchases or
receives in order to test or evaluate qualities pertaining to use for personal, household, family, or
charitable purposes.”.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) “Merchant” means a person, whether organized or operating for profit or for
a nonprofit purpose, who in the ordinary course of business does or would sell, lease, supply, or
transfer, either directly or indirectly and with or without cost to the consumer, consumer goods or
services, or a person who in the ordinary course of business does or would supply the goods or
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
services that are or would be the subject matter of a trade practice. For the purposes of this
chapter:
“(A) A person need not have a contractual relationship with the consumer
to qualify as a merchant;
“(B) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the term
“merchant” does not include the District of Columbia, its agencies or instrumentalities, or any
employee thereof acting within the scope of the employee’s official duties; and
“(C) The term “merchant”:
“(i) May include a person, who, in the ordinary course of business,
provides goods or services to or on behalf of a merchant in the course of, related to, or incidental
to a consumer transaction;
“(ii) Shall include the successors or assigns of a merchant, and
such successors or assigns shall be subject to the same claims and defenses the consumer had
against any predecessor merchant; and
“(iii) Shall include persons involved in the conduct or execution of a
charitable solicitation.”.
(C) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “a sale, lease or
transfer, of consumer goods or services;” and inserting the phrase “a sale, lease, or transfer of a
consumer good or service, or charitable solicitation;” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “real estate
transactions, and consumer services of all types;” and inserting the phrase “charitable donations,
real estate transactions, and consumer services of all types;” in its place.
(E) Paragraph (10) is amended to read as follows:
“(10) “Chief of the Office of Enforcement” means the senior administrative
officer of the Department’s Office of Enforcement who is delegated the responsibility of carrying
out certain duties specified under § 28-3905;”.
(F) Paragraph (11) is repealed.
(G) Paragraph (12) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
(H) Paragraph (13) is repealed.
(I) Paragraph (14)(B) is amended by striking the period and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(J) Paragraph (15) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(K) A new paragraph (16) is added to read as follows:
“(16) “Infant formula product” means a food which purports to be, or is
represented for special dietary use solely as, a food for infants by reason of its simulation of
human milk or its suitability as a complete or partial substitute for human milk.”.
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) assure that a just mechanism exists to remedy all improper trade practices, by
any merchant and at any stage or related or necessary point in the economic process whether
before, during the course of, or after the original transaction;”.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(C) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(D) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) deter the continuing use of improper trade practices.”.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) In construing the terms of this chapter, due consideration and weight shall be given
to:
“(1) The interpretation by the Federal Trade Commission (“FTC”) and the federal
courts of the term ”unfair or deceptive act or practice“, as employed in section 5(a) of An Act To
create a Federal Trade Commission, to define its powers and duties, and for other purposes,
approved September 26, 1914 (38 Stat. 719; 15 U.S.C. § 45(a));
“(2) Interpretative guidance, including the Guides for the Use of Environmental
Marketing Claims (“Green Guides”), 16 C.F.R. Part 260, published by the FTC; and
“(3) The interpretation by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau and the
federal courts of the term ”abusive act or practice”, as employed in section 1031(d) of the
Consumer Financial Protection Act of 2010, approved July 21, 2010 (124 Stat. 2005; 12 U.S.C. §
5531(d)).”.
(4) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
“(f) In any action brought under this chapter, the burden of proof shall be by the
preponderance of the evidence, unless otherwise specified in this chapter.”.
(c) Section 28-3902 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) The Director of the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection shall exercise
the powers set forth in § 28-3905 through the Office of Enforcement, and shall appoint a Chief of
the Office of Enforcement, who may carry out investigative, conciliatory, and other duties
assigned by the Director.”.
(2) Subsections (e) and (i) are repealed.
(d) Section 28-3903 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) New paragraphs (3A), (3B), and (3C) are added to read as follows:
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3A) summarily suspend a license for failure to comply with the Department’s
cease and desist order as determined by the Department in accordance with § 28-3903a;
“(3B) summarily suspend a license if the Department determines that trade
practices are in violation of District law and present an imminent danger to the health, safety, or
welfare of persons in the District in accordance with § 28-3903a;
“(3C) summarily close a business if the Department determines that the trade
practices are in violation of District law and present an imminent danger to the health, safety, or
welfare of persons in the District in accordance with § 28-3903a;”.
(B) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “the interest of the
District of Columbia consumer public;” and inserting the phrase “the interest of consumers in the
District of Columbia;” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “to the consumer
public of the District of Columbia;” and inserting the phrase “to consumers in the District of
Columbia;” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “promote the welfare
of District of Columbia consumers;” and inserting the phrase “promote the welfare of consumers
in the District of Columbia;” in its place.
(E) Paragraph (12) is amended by striking the phrase “and sign consent
decrees;” and inserting the phrase “and sign consent decrees and settlement agreements;” in its
place.
(F) Paragraph (17) is amended by striking the phrase “Class 2 infraction”
and inserting the phrase “Class 1 infraction” in its place.
(e) A new section 28-3903a is added to read as follows:
“§ 28-3903a. Cease and desist orders; summary suspension; summary closure.
“(a) If the Department, after investigation, determines that a person is violating any
provision of this chapter and the violation has caused, or may cause, an imminent danger to the
health, safety, or welfare of residents of the District, the Department may issue an order requiring
the alleged violator to cease and desist immediately from the violation. The order shall be served
by certified mail or delivery in person.
“(b) If a person fails to comply with a lawful order to cease and desist from the
Department under this section, the Department may summarily suspend a license as set forth in
this section without a hearing.
“(c) If the Department determines, after an investigation, a merchant has violated a
provision in this chapter and its violation presents an immediate danger to the health, safety, and
welfare of persons in the District the Department may summarily close the business without a
hearing.
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(d) If the Department orders the summary suspension of a license or summary closure
pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this section, the Department shall post 2 notices in
conspicuous places at or near the main street entrance of the outside of the establishment.
“(e) The posted notice shall state that the license has been suspended or the establishment
has been summarily closed, the period of suspension or closure, and that the suspension or
closure is ordered because of a violation of this chapter or of the regulations promulgated under
this chapter.
“(f) Any person willfully removing, obliterating, or defacing the notice shall be guilty of
a violation of this chapter.
“(h) Every decision and order adverse to a person shall be in writing and shall be
accompanied by findings of fact and conclusions of law. The findings shall be supported by, and
in accordance with, reliable, probative, and substantial evidence. The Office of Administrative
Hearings shall provide a copy of the decision and order and accompanying findings of fact and
conclusions of law to each party to a case or to his or her attorney of record.
“(i) A person aggrieved by a final summary action may file an appeal in accordance with
the procedures set forth in § 2-1831.16.”.
(f) Section 28-3904 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 28-3904. Unfair, deceptive, and abusive trade practices.
“(a) It shall be a violation of this chapter for any merchant to engage in an unfair,
deceptive, or abusive trade practice, whether or not any consumer is in fact misled, deceived, or
damaged thereby. Without limiting the general application of the foregoing, it is an unfair,
deceptive, or abusive trade practice prohibited by this chapter to:
“(1) Represent that goods or services have a source, sponsorship, approval,
certification, licensure, accessories, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that
they do not have;
“(2) Represent that the person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation,
certification, licensure, or connection that the person does not have;
“(3) Represent that goods are original or new if in fact they are deteriorated,
altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, or second hand, or have been used;
“(4) Represent that goods or services are of particular standard, quality, grade,
style, or model, if in fact they are of another;
“(5) Misrepresent as to a material fact which has a tendency to mislead;
“(6) Represent that a transaction confers or involves rights, remedies, or
obligations which it does not have or involve, or which are prohibited by law;
“(7) Fail to state a material fact if such failure tends to mislead;
“(8) Use innuendo or ambiguity as to a material fact, which has a tendency to
mislead;
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(9) Disparage the goods, services, or business of another by false or misleading
representations of material facts;
“(10) Advertise or offer goods or services without the intent to sell them or
without the intent to sell them as advertised or offered;
“(11) Advertise or offer goods or services without supplying reasonably expected
public demand, unless the advertisement or offer discloses a limitation of quantity or other
qualifying condition which has no tendency to mislead;
“(12) Advertising, displaying, or offering a price for a good or service that does
not include all mandatory fees or charges other than:
“(A) Taxes or fees imposed by a government on the transaction; and
“(B) Postage or carriage charges that will be reasonably and actually
incurred to ship the physical good to the consumer;
“(13) Make false or misleading representations of fact concerning the reasons for,
existence of, or amounts of price reductions, or the price in comparison to price of competitors or
one’s own price at a past or future time;
“(14) Falsely state that services, replacements, or repairs are needed;
“(15) Falsely state the reasons for offering or supplying goods or services at sale
or discount prices;
“(16) Harass or threaten a consumer with any act other than legal process, either
by telephone, cards, letters, or any form of electronic or social media;
“(17) Cease work on, or return after ceasing work on, an electrical or mechanical
apparatus, appliance, chattel or other goods, or merchandise, in other than the condition
contracted for, or to impose a separate charge to reassemble or restore such an object to such a
condition without notification of such charge prior to beginning work on or receiving such
object;
“(18) Replace parts or components in an electrical or mechanical apparatus,
appliance, chattel or other goods, or merchandise when such parts or components are not
defective, unless requested by the consumer;
“(19) Falsely state or represent that repairs, alterations, modifications, or servicing
have been made and receiving remuneration therefor when they have not been made;
“(20) Fail to supply to a consumer a copy of a sales or service contract, lease,
promissory note, trust agreement, or other evidence of indebtedness which the consumer may
execute;
“(21) Make or enforce unconscionable terms or provisions of sales, leases, or any
other form of consumer contract, agreement, or transaction; in applying this paragraph,
consideration shall be given to the following, and other factors:
“(A) Knowledge by the merchant at the time credit sales are consummated
that there was no reasonable probability of payment in full of the obligation by the consumer;
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Knowledge by the merchant at the time of the sale or lease of the
inability of the consumer to receive substantial benefits from the property or services sold or
leased;
“(C) Gross disparity between the price of the property or services sold or
leased and the value of the property or services measured by the price at which similar property
or services are readily obtainable in transactions by like buyers or lessees;
“(D) That the merchant contracted for or received separate charges for
insurance with respect to credit sales with the effect of making the sales, considered as a whole,
unconscionable; and
“(E) That the merchant has knowingly taken advantage of the inability of
the consumer reasonably to protect their interests in selecting or using the product or service by
virtue of circumstances such as age, physical or mental abilities, lack of relevant knowledge,
reading ability, or difficulty understanding the language of the agreement, or similar factors;
“(22) Pass off goods or services as those of another;
“(23) Use deceptive representations or designations of geographic origin in
connection with goods or services;
“(24) Represent that the subject of a transaction has been supplied in accordance
with a previous representation when it has not;
“(25) Misrepresent the authority of a salesman, representative or agent to
negotiate the final terms of a transaction;
“(26) Offer for sale or distribute any consumer product which is not in conformity
with an applicable consumer product safety standard or has been ruled a banned hazardous
product under the Consumer Product Safety Act (“Act”), approved October 27, 1972 (86 Stat.
1207; 15 U.S.C. § 2051 et seq.), without holding a certificate issued in accordance with section
14(a) of the Act (15 U.S.C. § 2063), to the effect that such consumer product conforms to all
applicable consumer product safety rules (unless the certificate holder knows that such consumer
product does not conform), or without relying in good faith on the representation of the
manufacturer or a distributor of such product that the product is not subject to a consumer
product safety rule issued under the Act;
“(27) Sell consumer goods in a condition or manner not consistent with that
warranted by operation of §§ 28:2-312 through 28:2-318, or by operation or requirement of
federal law;
“(28) Retaliate against any person for:
“(A) Filing a consumer complaint with any agency tasked with the
enforcement of these provisions;
“(B) Filing a lawsuit in court pursuant to this chapter;
“(C) Making any manner of complaint, grievance, or communication to a
company accused of violating provisions of this chapter; or
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(D) Assisting or participating in any manner in an investigation,
proceeding, or hearing under this chapter;
“(29) Materially interfere with the ability of a consumer to review or understand a
term or condition of a consumer contract, agreement, or transaction; or
“(30) Take unreasonable advantage of:
“(A) A lack of understanding on the part of the consumer of the material
risks, costs, or conditions of the product or service;
“(B) The inability of the consumer to protect their interests in selecting or
using a consumer financial product or service; or
“(C) The reasonable reliance by the consumer on a merchant purporting to
act in the interest of the consumer.
“(b) It shall be a violation of this chapter for any merchant to engage in a trade practice in
violation of any law or regulation in the context of a consumer transaction, whether or not any
consumer is in fact misled, deceived, or damaged thereby. Without limiting the general
application of the foregoing, it is an unlawful trade practice prohibited by this chapter to:
“(1) Violate any provision of § 28-3818;
“(2) Violate any provision of § 28-3819 or, if a rental housing locator, to refuse or
fail to honor any obligation under a rental housing locator contract;
“(3) Violate any provision of Chapter 46 of this title;
“(4) Violate any provision of §§ 32-404, 32-405, 32-406, or 32-407;
“(5) Refuse to provide the repairs, refunds, or replacement motor vehicles or fails
to provide the disclosures of defects or damages required by § 50-501 et seq.;
“(6) Violate any provision of §§ 42-2302 or 42-2303;
“(7) Violate any provision of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations;
“(8) Violate any provision of Chapter 16A of Title 31;
“(9) Violate any provision of Chapter 33 of this title;
“(10) Violate any provision of § 42-2431 et seq.;
“(11) Fail to make a disclosure as required by § 26-1113(a-1);
“(12) Violate any provision of Chapter 53 of this title;
“(13) Violate any agreement entered into pursuant to § 28-3909(c)(6);
“(14) Violate any provision of Subchapter II of Chapter 38 of this title;
“(15) Violate any provision of Chapter 54 of this title;
“(16) Sell or offer for sale any infant formula product at a price greater than 20%
above the average price at which that person sold or offered for sale a substantially similar infant
formula product in the District during the 90-day period preceding February 17, 2022, or, if the
person did not sell or offer for sale infant formula during the 90-day period preceding February
17, 2022, to sell or offer for sale any infant formula product at a price greater than 20% above the
12

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
average price at which substantially similar retailers sold or offered for sale substantially similar
infant formula products in the District during the 90-day period preceding February 17, 2022;
“(17) Violate any provision of § 28-3814;
“(18) Violate any provision of Title 12 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations; or
“(19) Violate any provision of § 29-102.01.
“(b) It shall be a violation of this chapter for a person, whether or not a merchant, to aid
and knowingly or recklessly abet the commission of an unfair, deceptive, abusive, or unlawful
trade practice by a merchant, and regardless of whether the manner in which the person aids and
abets the unlawful action is itself a trade practice.”.
(g) Section 28-3905 is amended to read as follows:
“28-3905. Complaint procedures.
“(a) An investigation shall begin by filing with the Department a complaint plainly
describing a trade practice and stating the complainant’s, and if different, the consumer’s name,
mailing address, and electronic mail address, and the respondent’s name, mailing address, and
electronic mail address, if known, and such other information the Director may require. The
complaint shall be in, or reduced by the Director to, writing. The filing of a complaint with the
Department shall toll the periods for limitation of time for bringing an action as set forth in § 12-
301 until the complaint has been resolved through a final order issued by the Office of
Administrative Hearings, consent order, or settlement agreement.
“(b)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Director shall
investigate each such complaint and determine:
“(A) What trade practice actually occurred; and
“(B) Whether the trade practice which occurred violates any statute,
regulation, rule of common law, or other law of the District of Columbia.
“(2) The Director may, in their discretion, decline to investigate, in a whole or in
part, a complaint. If the Director declines to investigate, in a whole or in part, a complaint, the
Director shall notify the complainant, in writing, of the determination.
“(c) In carrying out an investigation and determination pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, the Director shall consult the respondent and such other available sources of
information, and make such other efforts, as appropriate and necessary, to carry out such duties.
“(d) If at any time the Director finds that the trade practice complained of may, in whole
or in part, be a violation of law other than a law of the District of Columbia or a law within the
jurisdiction of the Department, the Director may in writing so inform the complainant,
respondent, and officials of the District, the United States, or other jurisdiction, who would
properly enforce such law.
“(e) The Director shall determine that there are, or are not, reasonable grounds to believe
that a trade practice, in violation of a law of the District of Columbia within the jurisdiction of
13

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the Department, has occurred in any part or all of the case. The Director may find that there are
not such reasonable grounds for any of the following reasons:
“(1) Any violation of law which may have occurred is of a law not of the District
of Columbia or not within the jurisdiction of the Department, or occurred more than 3 years prior
to filing of the complaint;
“(2) In case of paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply, no trade practice
occurred in violation of any law of the District;
“(3) The respondent cannot be identified or located, or would not be subject to the
personal jurisdiction of the District of Columbia court;
“(4) The complainant, to the Director’s knowledge, no longer seeks redress in the
case;
“(5) The complainant and respondent, to the Director’s knowledge, have
themselves reached an agreement which settles the case; or
“(6) The complainant can no longer be located.
“(f) The Director may reject and dismiss any part of a complaint to which one or more of
the reasons stated in subsection (e) of this section apply. The Director shall inform all parties in
writing of the determination, and, if any part or all of the complaint is rejected and dismissed,
shall specify which reason in subsection (e) of this section apply to which part of the complaint,
and such other detail as is necessary to explain the rejection and dismissal.
“(g)(1) The Director, at any time, may attempt to settle a complaint for which reasonable
grounds are found in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.
“(2) The Department shall administer the settlement proceedings in a manner
determined by the Director or their designee. All settlement proceedings shall be informal and
include all interested parties and such representative as the parties may choose to represent them.
Such proceedings shall be private and confidential, and nothing said or done, except a consent
decree or settlement agreement, shall be made public or introduced into the record of a court of
competent jurisdiction by the Department or any party unless the parties jointly agree thereto in
writing. The representative of the Department may call settlement conferences.
“(3) For persistent and unreasonable failure by the complainant to attend such
settlement conferences or to take part in other settlement proceedings, at the discretion of the
Director, they or their designee may dismiss the complaint.
“(4) A consent decree or settlement agreement described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection may only be modified by a joint agreement between the Department, the complainant,
and respondent.
“(h)(1) If complainant and the respondent are unable to reach a settlement in accordance
with subsection (g) of this section, and the Director has determined that there are reasonable
grounds that there is a trade practice that occurred in violation of District law, the Department
shall impose a civil fine, penalty, or fee in accordance with subsection (i) of this section.
14

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) Appeals of a civil fine, penalty, or fee imposed by the Director pursuant to
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be in accordance with Chapter 18A of Title 2.
“(i)(1) Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed for a violation of this chapter
pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.
“(2) A violation of this chapter shall constitute a Class I infraction pursuant to §
3200.1(a) of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16 DCMR § 3200.1(a)).
“(3) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a fine amount for a violation of this chapter,
as set forth in § 3201.1 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (16 DCMR
§ 3201.1), shall be adjusted according to the most recent Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers in the Washington Metropolitan Statistical area, as published by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics, and shall be posted in the District of Columbia Register on or after
January 1 of every year thereafter.
“(j)(1) After the Director’s determination as to whether the complaint is within the
Department’s jurisdiction, in accordance with subsection (e-1) of this section, the Director shall:
“(A) Effect a consent decree pursuant to subsection (g) of this section;
“(B) Reject and dismiss the complaint in accordance with subsection (f) of
this section; or
“(C) Adhere to notification procedures outlined in Chapter 18 of Title 2.“(2)
When the case is transmitted to the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Office of Enforcement
shall sign and serve the respondent with a copy of the Notice of Infraction. The case shall
proceed under § 2-509. The Director shall be a party on behalf of the complainant. Applications
to intervene shall be decided as may be proper or required by law or rule. Reasonable discovery
shall be freely allowed. Any finding or decision may be modified or set aside, in whole or part,
before a notice of appeal is filed in the case, or the time to so file has run out.
“(k)(1)The Department, the complainant, or the respondent may file a complaint in the
Superior Court of the District of Columbia (“Court”) for a remedy, enforcement, or assessment
or collection of a civil penalty, when any violation or failure to adhere to a provision of a consent
decree described in subsection (g) of this section, or a final order from the Office of
Administrative Hearings has occurred. The Department shall file a complaint in the Court for
assessment of a civil penalty when an order has been issued and become final. A failure by the
Department or any person to file a complaint or prosecute under this subparagraph in regard to
any provision or violation of a provision of any consent decree or order, shall not constitute a
waiver of such provision or any right under such provision. The Court shall levy the appropriate
civil penalties, and may order, if supported by evidence, a temporary, preliminary, or permanent
injunction, damages, treble damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, consumer redress, or other
remedy. The Court may set aside the final order if the Court determines that the Department
lacked jurisdiction over the respondent or that the complaint was frivolous. If, after considering
an application to set aside an order of the Department, the Court determines that the application
15

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
was frivolous or that the Department lacked jurisdiction, the Court shall award reasonable
attorney’s fees.
“(2) Application to the Court to enforce an order shall be made at no cost to the
District of Columbia or the complainant.
“(3) The Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall represent the
Department in all proceedings described in this subsection.
“(l) If, at any time before notice of appeal of a final order issued by the Office of
Administrative Hearings in accordance with Chapter 18 of Title 2 is filed or the time to so file
has run out, the Director believes that legal action is necessary to preserve the subject matter of
the case, to prevent further injury to any party, or to enable the Department ultimately to order a
full and fair remedy in the case, the Department shall present the matter to the Office of
Administrative Hearings, which may issue a cease and desist order to take effect immediately, or
grant such other relief as will assure a just adjudication of the case, in accordance with such
beliefs of the Director which are substantiated by evidence. Any person aggrieved by an order
from the Office of Administrative Hearings may appeal in accordance with Chapter 18A of Title
2.
“(m)(1)(A) A consumer may bring an action seeking relief from the use of a trade
practice in violation of a law of the District.
“(B) An individual may, on behalf of that individual, or on behalf of both
the individual and the general public, bring an action seeking relief from the use of a trade
practice in violation of District law or regulations when that trade practice involves consumer
goods or services that the individual purchased or received in order to test or evaluate qualities
pertaining to use for personal, household, family, or charitable purposes.
“(C) A nonprofit organization may, on behalf of itself or any of its
members, or on any such behalf and on behalf of the general public, bring an action seeking
relief from the use of a trade practice in violation of District law or regulations, including a
violation involving consumer goods or services that the organization purchased or received in
order to test or evaluate qualities pertaining to use for personal, household, family, or charitable
purposes.
“(D)(i) Subject to sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph, a public
interest organization may, on behalf of the interests of a consumer or a class of consumers, bring
an action seeking relief from the use by any person of a trade practice in violation of a law of the
District if the consumer or class could bring an action under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
for relief from such use by such person of such trade practice.
“(ii) An action brought under sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph shall be dismissed if the Court determines that the public interest organization does
not have a sufficient nexus to the interests involved of the consumer or class to adequately
represent those interests.
16

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) Any claim under this chapter shall be brought in the Superior Court of the
District of Columbia and may recover or obtain the following remedies:
“(A)(i) Treble damages, or $3,000 per violation, whichever is greater,
which shall be adjusted for inflation using the greater of either 3% annually or the percentage
increase in the most recent Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers in the Washington
Metropolitan Statistical area, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics; and
“(ii) Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph,
for a violation of § 28-3904(b)(14), a consumer may recover or obtain actual damages, which
shall not include dignitary damages, including pain and suffering. This exclusion shall not limit
the availability of dignitary damages for violations of any other provision of this section;
“(B) Reasonable attorney’s fees;
“(C) Punitive damages;
“(D) An injunction against the use of the unlawful trade practice;
“(E) In representative actions, additional relief as may be necessary to
refund to the consumer money, or restore to the consumer money or property, real or personal,
which may have been acquired by means of the unlawful trade practice; or
“(F) Any other relief which the court determines proper.
“(3) Any prevailing consumer under this chapter shall also recover reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs to be paid by the defendant in accordance with the method cited in § 32-
1308(b), except that attorney’s fees shall not be considered costs.
“(4) An action brought by a person under this subsection against a nonprofit
organization shall be based on a dispute arising from a trade practice and not based solely on
membership in such organization, membership services, training or credentialing activities, sale
of publications of the nonprofit organization, medical or legal malpractice, or other similar
activity.
“(5) The right of action established by this subsection shall apply to trade
practices arising from landlord-tenant relations.
“(6)(A) Commencement of an action by the Attorney General under § 28-3909,
including the maintenance of an action previously commenced and pending as the effective date
of the Enhancing Consumer Protection Procedures Amendment Act, passed on 2nd reading on
June 2, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-174), shall serve to stay until the resolution of the
Attorney General’s action in any civil action that includes any claim that is:
“(i) Made pursuant to this subsection by a public interest
organization or on behalf of the general public; and
“(ii) Based in whole or in part on any matter complained of in the
action commenced by the Attorney General.
17

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) A plaintiff that is a public interest organization or is acting on behalf
of the general public shall provide notice to the Office of the Attorney General within 10
business days after the filing of an action that includes a claim under this subsection.
“(7) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a merchant from
asserting, and the Court from finding, that an action by a consumer was groundless and brought
in bad faith or brought for the purpose of harassment and, in such cases, the Court shall award to
the defendant reasonable and necessary attorney’s fees in defending the action plus court costs.
“(n) The Director may use any power granted to the Department in § 28-3903, as each
reasonably deems will aid in carrying out the functions assigned to each in this section. Each,
while holding the primary responsibility of the Department for decision in a certain case, may
join such case with others then before the Department. No case may be disposed of in a manner
not expressly authorized in this section. Every complaint filed with the Department and within its
jurisdiction shall be decided in accordance with the procedures and sanctions of this section,
notwithstanding that a given trade practice, at issue in the case, may be governed in whole or in
part by another law which has different enforcement procedures and sanctions.
“(o) Whenever requested, the Department will make available to the complainant and
respondent an explanation, and any other information helpful in understanding, the provisions of
any consent decree to which the Department agrees.
“(p) There shall be established a Consumer Protection Education Fund (“Fund”). All
fines, fees, and penalties shall be paid into the Fund in order to further the purpose of this chapter
as enumerated in § 28-3901.
“(q) Every complaint case that is before the Department in accordance with this section
shall proceed with confidence, except for hearings and meetings before the Office of
Administrative Hearings, until the Department issues a consent decree or settlement agreement
or the Office of Administrative Hearings issues a final order.
“(r) The Director may file a complaint in accordance with subsection (a) of this section,
on behalf of one or more consumers, or as complainant, based on evidence and information
gathered by the Department in carrying out this chapter. Persons not parties to but directly or
indirectly intended as beneficiaries of an order described in this section, a consent decree, or a
settlement agreement, arising out of a complaint filed by the Director, may enforce such order or
decree in the manner provided in subsection (j)(1) of this section.”.
(h) Section 28-3906 is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The Consumer Protection Unit is established within the Office of Enforcement. The
Consumer Protection Unit shall:”.
(2) Subsection (b) is repealed.
(3) Subsection (c) is repealed.
(i) Section 28-3907 is repealed.
18

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(j) Section 28-3909 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if the Attorney General for the
District of Columbia has reason to believe that any person has used, is using, or intends to use
any method, act, or practice in violation of section 28-3803, 28-3805, 28-3807, 28-3810, 28-
3811, 28-3812, 28-3814, 28-3817, 28-3818, 28-3819, 28-3851, 28-3852, 28-3852.01, 28-
3852.02, or 28-3904, and if it is in the public interest, the Attorney General, in the name of the
District of Columbia, may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to
obtain a temporary or permanent injunction:
“(1) Prohibiting the use of the method, act, or practice;
“(2) Requiring the violator to take affirmative action, including the restitution of
money or property;
“(3) Freezing, where appropriate, the alleged violator’s assets to ensure adequate
funds are available to pay restitution, damages, and penalties;
“(4) Placing an entity in receivership; or
“(5) Dissolving an entity.”.
(2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) In any action under this section, the Attorney General shall not be required to
prove damages and the injunction shall be issued without bond.”.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended by striking the word “may” and
inserting the word “shall” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “civil penalty of” and
inserting the phrase “civil penalty of not less than $500 and” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “civil penalty of” and
inserting the phrase “civil penalty of not less than $1,000 and” in its place.
(4) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
“(b-1)(1) Any request by the Attorney General for costs and fees shall be presumptively
reasonable where the defendants in the action did not expend substantially less in costs and fees
than the amount in the Attorney General’s request. Where the defendants in the action expended
substantially less in costs and fees than the amount in the Attorney General’s request, the
Attorney General may still prove the reasonableness of the request under the same standards
applicable to a private plaintiff.
“(2) The Attorney General may also seek reasonable costs and fees expended in a
pre-suit investigation where the subject matter of the investigation was pertinent to the
subsequent suit brought under this section.”.
19

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(5) Subsection (c)(4) is amended by striking the phrase “and in the extension of
consumer credit;” and inserting the phrase “, in the extension of consumer credit, and in the
solicitation of charitable donations;” in its place.
(6) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
“(e) In any action brought under this section or in an investigation by the Attorney
General under § 28-3910, any confidentiality agreement or protective order agreed to by the
Attorney General or otherwise entered into or enforced by a court shall permit the Attorney
General to share documents designated as confidential with any law enforcement agency;
provided, that the law enforcement agency agrees to abide by the confidentiality restrictions in
the confidentiality agreement or protective order.”.
(k) Section 28-3910 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 28-3910. Investigatory powers of Attorney General for the District of Columbia.
“(a)(1) In the course of an investigation to determine whether to seek relief under § 28-
3909, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia may:
“(A) Subpoena witnesses;
“(B) Administer oaths;
“(C) Examine an individual under oath;
“(D) Require sworn answers in writing to written interrogatories; and
“(E) Compel production of records, books, papers, contracts, and other
documents, verified by a sworn certificate of completion.
“(2) Service of any demand document issued under this section may be made by
first-class mail, electronic mail, or any other method reasonably calculated to give actual notice;
provided, that the Superior Court of the District of Columbia may exercise jurisdiction over the
recipient to compel a response consistent with the due process clause of the Constitution of the
United States.
“(3) Information obtained under this section shall not be admissible in a later
criminal proceeding against the person who provides the information or evidence, except with
respect to sworn statements that are themselves the basis for a subsequent perjury prosecution.
“(b) A subpoena or request for interrogatories issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall be issued in accordance with § 1-301.88d.”.
Sec. 5. Section 401(a) of the Fraudulent Vehicle Tag and Parking Enforcement
Modernization Amendment Act of 2024, effective May 2, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325, 72 DCR
1284), is amended by striking the phrase "Sections 113, 114(b) and 201(c)(2) shall apply" and
inserting the phrase "Section 201(c)(2) shall apply" in its place.
Sec. 6. Applicability.
20

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Section 4(c), (d), (e), (g), and (h) shall apply upon the date of inclusion of their fiscal
effect in an approved budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provisions identified in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 7. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 8. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
21